District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Lowering the Cost of Prescription Drugs Act of 2026”
Sec. 2. Discount drug card program.
(a) The Mayor shall establish a drug discount card program (“program”) by entering into,
on behalf of the District of Columbia, a cooperative purchasing agreement with a prescription
drug discount program, which may include a multi-state non-profit prescription drug purchasing
consortium, for the purpose of lowering prescription drug costs for District residents.
(b) The Department of Health shall implement the program to give all District residents,
including those with public insurance, private insurance, and no insurance, access to the lower-
cost prescription drugs established by the program.

(c) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement the provisions of this act.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).